District of Columbia statutes.
2-219.52

Requirements of the Mayor.

(a)

The Mayor, through the Department of Employment Services, shall create a listing of all jobs that have become available through grants or funding under the ARRA.

(b)

The Mayor, through the Department of Employment Services, shall maintain a list of ARRA-funded positions that have been filled by District residents. The list of District residents hired as a result of ARRA grants or funding shall be reported to the Council.

History

July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-194, § 3, 57 DCR 4512

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3 of the Stimulus Accountability Temporary Act of 2009 (D.C. Law 18-75, October 22, 2009, law notification 56 DCR 8660).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Stimulus Accountability Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-143, July 13, 2009, 56 DCR 5872).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Stimulus Accountability Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-194, October 5, 2009, 56 DCR 8124).